Montana, session 2025, LC3345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-6-214, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-214. Unlawful contest or prize. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (1)(b) through (1)(d),
a person, firm, or club may not offer or give a prize, gift, or anything of value in connection with or as a bag limit
prize for the taking, capturing, killing, or in any manner acquiring any game, fowl, or fur-bearing animal or any
bird or animal protected by law.
(b) A prize may be awarded for any one game bird or fur-bearing animal on the basis of size,
quality, or rarity.
(c) A person may conduct or sponsor a contest for which the monetary prize, certificate, or award
does not exceed $50 for a person who kills a game animal possessing the largest antlers or horns, carrying the
greatest weight, or having the longest body or any similar contest based upon the size or weight of a game
animal or part of a game animal. The monetary restriction provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to
recognition given by a nationally established and recognized Boone and Crockett trophy institute.
(d) Reimbursements for receipts of costs incurred related to the hunting or trapping of wolves may
be given to persons licensed to hunt or trap wolves pursuant to Title 87, chapter 2.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC3345.1
(2) A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be fined not less than $50 or more than
$1,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the
person, upon conviction or forfeiture of bond or bail, may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing,
or trapping license issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state or to use state lands,
as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational purposes for a period of time set by the court."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****